Maryland, session 2025, SB0494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
10A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) (1) “Public–private partnership” means a method for delivering public
infrastructure assets using a long–term, performance–based agreement between a
reporting agency and a private entity where appropriate risks and benefits can be allocated
in a cost–effective manner between the contractual partners in which:
(i) a private entity performs functions normally undertaken by the
government, but the reporting agency remains ultimately accountable for the public
infrastructure asset and its public function; and
(ii) the State may retain ownership in the public infrastructure asset
and the private entity may be given additional decision–making rights in determining how
the asset is financed, developed, constructed, operated, and maintained over its life cycle.
(2) “Public–private partnership” does not include:
(i) a short–term operating space lease entered into in the ordinary
course of business by a unit of State government and a private entity and approved under
§ 4–321 or § 12–204 of this article;
(ii) a procurement governed by Division II of this article;
(iii) public–private partnership agreements entered into by the
University System of Maryland, St. Mary’s College of Maryland, Morgan State University,
or Baltimore City Community College, where no State funds are used to fund or finance
any portion of a capital project; or
(iv) a revenue–producing transportation facility under
21.01.03.03B.(1)(d) of the Code of Maryland Regulations that is not a public–private
partnership as defined under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(g) “Reporting agency” means:
(1) the Department of General Services;

SENATE BILL 494 3
(2) the Maryland Department of Transportation, for public infrastructure
assets of any of its modal administrations;
(3) the Maryland Transportation Authority;
(4) the University System of Maryland;
(5) Morgan State University;
(6) St. Mary’s College of Maryland; and
(7) the Baltimore City Community College.
10A–103.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 17–1001 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) A REPORTING AGENCY SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER IT IS IN THE
BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE TO USE CONTRACTORS WHO PARTICIPATE IN
REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS AND OFFER A RELIABLE PLAN FOR
LABOR STAFFING ON A PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP.
(2) A DECISION TO REQUIRE OR ENCOURAGE THE USE OF
CONTRACTORS WHO PARTICIPATE IN REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
AND OFFER A RELIABLE PLAN FOR LABOR STAFFING ON A PUBLIC–PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP:
(I) SHALL BE MADE ON A PROJECT–BY–PROJECT BASIS AND
BEFORE SELECTING THE METHOD OF CONTRACTING THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP; AND
(II) MAY BE MADE ONLY IF THE AGREEMENT ADVANCES THE
STATE’S INTERESTS REGARDING COST, EFFICIENCY, QUALITY, SAFETY, HEALTH,
TIMELINESS, A SKILLED LABOR FORCE, AND LABOR STABILITY.
(3) IN MAKING THE DECISION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE REPORTING AGENCY SHALL CONSIDER THE TOTALITY OF THE
CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF TRADES AND CRAFTS ANTICIPATED TO BE
USED ON THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP;

SENATE BILL 494
(II) THE SIZE, COMPLEXITY, AND URGENCY OF AND NEED FOR
THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP;
(III) THE POTENTIAL HARM TO THE PUBLIC IF A DELAY OCCURS;
(IV) THE IMPACT, IF ANY, ON PROJECT COSTS AND THE STATE’S
OBLIGATION TO ENCOURAGE MAXIMUM PRACTICABLE COMPETITION FAVORING
OPEN COMPETITIVE BIDDING DURING THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS;
(V) THE IMPACT ON THE STATE’S SOCIOECONOMIC
PROCUREMENT PROGRAM POLICIES INCLUDING THE POLICY TO ADVANCE
WOMEN– AND MINORITY–OWNED BUSINESSES AND THEIR ABILITY TO COMPETE; AND
(VI) THE IMPACT ON WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
CONSTRUCTION AND THE POTENTIAL FOR GENERATING SKILLS TRAINING AND
EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR STATE RESIDENTS.
(4) FOR EACH PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP, THE REPORTING
AGENCY SHALL RECORD THE DECISION MADE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN WRITING.
(5) IF A REPORTING AGENCY MAKES THE DECISION TO REQUIRE OR
ENCOURAGE THE USE OF CONTRACTORS WHO PARTICIPATE IN REGISTERED
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS AND OFFER A RELIABLE PLAN FOR LABOR STAFFING
ON A PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP, THE APPLICABLE PROCUREMENT
DOCUMENTS SHALL:
(I) SPECIFY WHETHER THE QUALIFICATIONS ARE MANDATORY
OR WILL BE USED AS AN EVALUATION FACTOR IN ESTABLISHING THE
PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP; AND
(II) STATE ANY APPLICABLE APPRENTICESHIP UTILIZATION
TARGETS OR THRESHOLDS THAT WILL BE CONSIDERED IN THE DETERMINATION
REGARDING THE ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP
AGREEMENT.
(6) (I) A SUCCESSFUL BIDDER SHALL DEMONSTRATE ACCESS TO A
RELIABLE SUPPLY OF PROPERLY TRAINED PERSONNEL WHO HAVE THE REQUIRED
SKILL AND SAFETY TRAINING TO ENSURE SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE
PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP BY:
1. SPONSORING AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT
WILL SUPPLY APPRENTICES; OR

SENATE BILL 494 5
2. REACHING AN AGREEMENT WITH AN ENTITY THAT
OPERATES A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT CAN SUPPLY THE
APPRENTICES.
(II) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL
DETERMINE WHETHER A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT WILL
SUPPLY APPRENTICES ON THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP IS IN COMPLIANCE
WITH APPLICABLE PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS BEFORE THE REPORTING AGENCY
MAY ESTABLISH THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP.
(III) THE REPORTING AGENCY SHALL APPROVE THE BIDDER’S
FULFILLMENT OF THE REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE USE OF APPRENTICES ON
THE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP.
10A–103.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 17–1001 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) IF A PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT HAS A
PROJECTED COST EXCEEDING $5,000,000, THE REPORTING AGENCY SHALL
CONSIDER:
(I) WHETHER ALL OR A SUBSTANTIAL PART OF THE PROJECT IS
LOCATED IN AN AREA WITH HIGHER THAN AVERAGE UNEMPLOYMENT; AND
(II) IF SO, WHETHER IT IS IN THE STATE’S BEST INTEREST TO
CONSIDER WHETHER A BIDDER VOLUNTARILY SUBMITS A COMMUNITY HIRING,
TRAINING, OR OUTREACH PLAN FOR HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT AREAS AS A FACTOR IN
THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS OR PUBLIC NOTICE.
(2) IF THE REPORTING AGENCY DETERMINES, BASED ON A TOTALITY
OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES, THAT IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE TO
ENCOURAGE THE VOLUNTARY SUBMISSION OF A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT
ON A PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT, THE REPORTING AGENCY
SHALL:
(I) RECORD THE DECISION IN WRITING; AND
(II) INCLUDE IN THE RECORD:
1. A DEFINITION OF “HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT AREA”;

SENATE BILL 494
2. A DESCRIPTION OF THE HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT AREA
FOR PURPOSES OF THE PROCUREMENT OR PUBLIC NOTICE OF SOLICITATION; AND
3. AN EXPLANATION OF HOW THE PROFFER OF A
COMMUNITY HIRING, TRAINING, OR OUTREACH PLAN WILL BE EVALUATED IN THE
PROCUREMENT PROCESS OR PUBLIC NOTICE OF SOLICITATION.
11–101.
(a) In this Division II the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is provided for a particular title or provision.
(f) (1) “Construction” means the process of building, altering, improving, or
demolishing an improvement to real property.
(2) “Construction” includes any major work necessary to repair, prevent
damage to, or sustain existing components of an improvement to real property.
(3) “Construction” does not include the maintenance or routine operation
of an existing improvement to real property, or activities related to an energy performance
contract.
(y) (1) “Unit” means an officer or other entity that is in the Executive Branch
of the State government and is authorized by law to enter into a procurement contract.
(2) “Unit” does not include:
(i) a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty governmental
agency; or
(ii) a special tax district, sanitary district, drainage district, soil
conservation district, water supply district, or other political subdivision of the State.
11–203.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this Division II does not
apply to:
(1) procurement by:
(i) the Blind Industries and Services of Maryland;
(ii) the Maryland State Arts Council, for the support of the arts;

SENATE BILL 494 7
(iii) the Maryland Health and Higher Educational Facilities
Authority, if no State money is to be spent on a procurement contract;
(iv) the Maryland Industrial Training Program or the Partnership
for Workforce Quality Program in the Department of Commerce, for training services or
programs for new or expanding businesses or industries or businesses or industries in
transition;
(v) the Maryland Food Center Authority, to the extent the Authority
is exempt under Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the Economic Development Article;
(vi) the Maryland Public Broadcasting Commission:
1. for services of artists for educational and cultural
television productions; or
2. when planning for or fulfilling the obligations of grants or
cooperative agreements that support the educational and cultural activities of the
Commission;
(vii) public institutions of higher education, for cultural,
entertainment, and intercollegiate athletic procurement contracts;
(viii) the Maryland State Planning Council on Developmental
Disabilities, for services to support demonstration, pilot, and training programs;
(ix) the Maryland Historical Trust for:
1. surveying and evaluating architecturally, archeologically,
historically, or culturally significant properties; and
2. other than as to architectural services, preparing historic
preservation planning documents and educational material;
(x) the University of Maryland, for Global Campus Overseas
Programs, if the University adopts regulations that:
1. establish policies and procedures governing procurement
for Global Campus Overseas Programs; and
2. promote the purposes stated in § 11–201(a) of this subtitle;
(xi) the Department of Commerce, for negotiating and entering into
private sector cooperative marketing projects that directly enhance promotion of Maryland
and the tourism industry where there will be a private sector contribution to the project of

SENATE BILL 494
not less than 50% of the total cost of the project, if the project is reviewed by the Attorney
General and approved by the Secretary of Commerce or the Secretary’s designee;
(xii) the Rural Maryland Council;
(xiii) the Maryland State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency, for
negotiating and entering into private sector cooperative marketing projects that directly
enhance promotion of the Maryland State Lottery and its products, if the cooperative
marketing project:
1. provides a substantive promotional or marketing value
that the lottery determines acceptable in exchange for advertising or other promotional
activities provided by the lottery;
2. does not involve the advertising or other promotion of
alcohol or tobacco products; and
3. is reviewed by the Attorney General and approved by the
Maryland Lottery Director or the Director’s designee;
(xiv) the Maryland Health Insurance Plan established under Title 14,
Subtitle 5 of the Insurance Article;
(xv) the Maryland Energy Administration, when negotiating or
entering into grants or cooperative agreements with private entities to meet federal
specifications or solicitation requirements related to energy conservation, energy efficiency,
or renewable energy projects that benefit the State;
(xvi) the Maryland Developmental Disabilities Administration of the
Maryland Department of Health for family and individual support services, and individual
family care services, as those terms are defined by the Maryland Department of Health in
regulation;
(xvii) the Department of General Services for the rehabilitation of a
structure that is listed in or eligible for listing in the National Register of Historic Places,
to the extent the procurement is necessary to preserve the historic fabric of the structure
impacted by the rehabilitation, as determined by the Department of General Services in
consultation with the Maryland Historical Trust;
(xviii) the Department of Natural Resources, for:
1. negotiating or entering into grants, agreements, or
partnerships with nonprofit entities related to conservation service opportunities; and
2. negotiating or entering into pay–for–success contracts in
accordance with § 13–112.1 of this Division II; and

SENATE BILL 494 9
(xix) the State Archives for preservation, conservation, proper care,
restoration, and transportation of fine art or decorative art that is:
1. in the custody of the Commission on Artistic Property; and
2. owned by or loaned to the State;
(2) procurement by a unit from:
(i) another unit;
(ii) a political subdivision of the State;
(iii) an agency of a political subdivision of the State;
(iv) a government, including the government of another state, of the
United States, or of another country;
(v) an agency or political subdivision of a government; or
(vi) a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty governmental
agency; or
(3) procurement in support of enterprise activities for the purpose of:
(i) direct resale; or
(ii) remanufacture and subsequent resale.
(b) (1) The following provisions of this Division II apply to each procurement
enumerated in subsection (a) of this section:
(x) Title 17 of this article (“Special Provisions – State and Local
Subdivisions”).
(c) Except as provided in Title 12, Subtitle 4 and Title 14, Subtitle 3 of this article
and except for §§ 15–112 and 15–113 AND TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 10 of this article, this
Division II does not apply to the Maryland Stadium Authority.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “University” means the University System of
Maryland, Morgan State University, or St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, this Division II does
not apply to the University System of Maryland, Morgan State University, St. Mary’s
College of Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College.

SENATE BILL 494
(5) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (7) of this subsection, the
following provisions of Division II of this article apply to a University and to Baltimore City
Community College:
1. § 11–205 of this subtitle (“Collusion”);
2. § 11–205.1 of this subtitle (“Falsification, concealment,
etc., of material facts”);
3. § 13–219 of this article (“Required clauses –
Nondiscrimination clause”);
4. § 13–225 of this article (“Retainage”);
5. Title 14, Subtitle 3 of this article (“Minority Business
Participation”);
6. Title 14, Subtitle 7 of this article (“Certified Local Farm
and Fish Program”);
7. Title 15, Subtitle 1 of this article (“Procurement Contract
Administration”);
8. § 15–226 of this article (“Policy established; timing of
payments; notice upon nonpayment; disputes; appeals”); [and]
9. Title 16 of this article (“Suspension and Debarment of
Contractors”); AND
10. TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS ARTICLE (“PROJECT
LABOR AGREEMENTS AND COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENTS”).
(ii) If a procurement violates the provisions of this subsection or
policies adopted in accordance with this subsection, the procurement contract is void or
voidable in accordance with the provisions of § 11–204 of this subtitle.
(g) [This] EXCEPT FOR TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE, THIS
Division II does not apply to a contract or grant awarded by a unit of State government to
the Chesapeake Bay Trust for a project involving the restoration or protection of the
Chesapeake Bay and other aquatic and land resources of the State.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this Division II
does not apply to the Maryland Corps Program established under Title 24, Subtitle 11 of
the Education Article.

SENATE BILL 494 11
(2) The Maryland Corps Program established under Title 24, Subtitle 11 of
the Education Article is subject to Title 14, Subtitle 3 [and], § 15–113, AND TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 10 of this article.
(j) Except as provided in Title 12, Subtitle 4 [and], Title 14, Subtitle 3, AND
TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 10 of this article, this Division II does not apply to the Maryland
Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating Authority.
(k) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this Division II
does not apply to the West North Avenue Development Authority established under Title
12, Subtitle 7 of the Economic Development Article.
(2) The West North Avenue Development Authority established under
Title 12, Subtitle 7 of the Economic Development Article is subject to Title 12, Subtitle 4
[and], Title 14, Subtitle 3, AND TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 10 of this article.
17–201.
(a) In this subtitle, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following words
have the meanings indicated.
(k) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, “public work” means a
structure or work, including a bridge, building, ditch, road, alley, waterwork, or sewage
disposal plant, that:
(i) is constructed for public use or benefit; or
(ii) is paid for wholly or partly by public money.
(2) “Public work” does not include:
(i) unless let to contract, a structure or work whose construction is
performed by a public service company under order of the Public Service Commission or
other public authority regardless of:
1. public supervision or direction; or
2. payment wholly or partly from public money; or
(ii) a capital project that receives State funds in the annual State
capital budget as:
1. a local House of Delegates initiative; or
2. a local Senate initiative.

SENATE BILL 494
SUBTITLE 10. PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENTS AND COMMUNITY BENEFIT
AGREEMENTS.
17–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT” MEANS A CONTRACT SIGNED BY
ONE OR MORE RECOGNIZED COMMUNITY ASSOCIATIONS AND A LABOR
ORGANIZATION THAT REQUIRES THE LABOR ORGANIZATION TO PROVIDE SPECIFIC
AMENITIES, MITIGATIONS, ECONOMIC IMPACTS, LOCAL WORKFORCE TRAINING
GUARANTEES, OR OTHER BENEFITS IN EXCHANGE FOR COMMUNITY SUPPORT OF A
PROJECT.
(C) “LABOR ORGANIZATION” MEANS A LABOR ORGANIZATION, AS DEFINED
IN § 20–601 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, OF WHICH BUILDING AND
CONSTRUCTION EMPLOYEES ARE MEMBERS.
(D) “LARGE–SCALE PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT” MEANS A CONTRACT FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF A PUBLIC WORK, AS DEFINED IN § 17–201 OF THIS TITLE, FOR
WHICH THE TOTAL MONEY COMMITTED BY THE STATE, INCLUDING DIRECT
FUNDING, ISSUANCE OF BONDS, AND TAX INCREMENT FINANCING IS AT LEAST
$20,000,000.
(E) “PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT” MEANS A PREHIRE COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING AGREEMENT BETWEEN A SUCCESSFUL BIDDER ON A LARGE–SCALE
PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT AND ONE OR MORE LABOR ORGANIZATIONS THAT
ESTABLISHES TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT FOR ALL TRADES AND
CRAFTS PERFORMING WORK ON A SPECIFIC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT.
(F) “RECOGNIZED COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION” MEANS A COMMUNITY
GROUP LOCATED IN AN AREA IMPACTED BY A LARGE–SCALE PUBLIC WORK
CONTRACT THAT IS ORGANIZED COLLECTIVELY AROUND PARTICULAR INTERESTS
FOR THE PURPOSE OF ADDRESSING ISSUES AND INTERESTS COMMON TO THAT
COMMUNITY.
(G) “REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM” MEANS A PROGRAM THAT
IS REGISTERED WITH AND APPROVED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR OR THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AS EVIDENCED BY A CERTIFICATE OF
REGISTRATION OR OTHER APPROPRIATE DOCUMENTATION MEETING
APPRENTICESHIP STANDARDS.

SENATE BILL 494 13
(H) “SOCIOECONOMIC PROCUREMENT PROGRAMS” MEANS THE MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM, THE VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PROGRAM, AND THE SMALL BUSINESS RESERVE PROGRAM.
(I) “SOCIOECONOMIC PROCUREMENT PROGRAM GOALS” MEANS THE
STATE’S GOAL OF DIRECTING 29% OF ALL PROCUREMENT EXPENDITURES TOWARD
CERTIFIED MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE FIRMS AND 1% TOWARD CERTIFIED
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE FIRMS.
17–1002.
(A) FOR EACH LARGE–SCALE PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT, THE UNIT SHALL
CONSIDER:
(1) REQUIRING THE USE OF A PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT; OR
(2) INCLUDING THE USE OF A PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT AS AN
EVALUATION FACTOR.
(B) A DECISION TO REQUIRE THE USE OF A PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT
OR INCLUDE THE USE OF A PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT AS AN EVALUATION
FACTOR:
(1) SHALL BE MADE ON A PROJECT–BY–PROJECT BASIS AND BEFORE
SELECTING THE METHOD OF SOURCE SELECTION;
(2) SHALL BE SUPPORTED BY WRITTEN FINDINGS THAT CLEARLY
DEMONSTRATE HOW THE USE OF THE PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT WILL BE
COST–EFFECTIVE, EFFICIENT, AND SAFE AND WILL ENSURE QUALITY AND
TIMELINESS FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE PROJECT AND THE INTERESTS OF THE
PUBLIC AND THE STATE;
(3) SHALL BE SET FORTH IN THE REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS OR
INVITATION FOR BIDS; AND
(4) MAY BE MADE ONLY IF THE AGREEMENT ADVANCES THE STATE’S
INTERESTS REGARDING:
(I) COST;
(II) EFFICIENCY;
(III) QUALITY;

SENATE BILL 494
(IV) SAFETY;
(V) HEALTH;
(VI) TIMELINESS;
(VII) A SKILLED LABOR FORCE; AND
(VIII) LABOR STABILITY.
(C) IN MAKING A DECISION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE UNIT SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS:
(1) THE POTENTIAL FOR LABOR DISRUPTIONS, INCLUDING STRIKES,
LOCKOUTS, AND A REDUCTION IN LABOR, THAT COULD INTERFERE WITH THE
COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT;
(2) THE ANTICIPATED NUMBER OF TRADES AND CRAFTS NECESSARY
FOR THE PROJECT;
(3) THE COMPLEXITY, SIZE, AND URGENCY OF AND NEED FOR THE
PROJECT;
(4) THE POTENTIAL HARM TO THE PUBLIC IF A DELAY OCCURS;
(5) THE SOURCES OF FUNDING USED FOR THE PROJECT, INCLUDING
WHETHER FEDERAL FUNDS WILL BE USED;
(6) THE IMPACT, IF ANY, ON PROJECT COSTS AND THE STATE’S
OBLIGATION TO ENCOURAGE MAXIMUM PRACTICABLE COMPETITION FAVORING
OPEN COMPETITIVE BIDDING DURING THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS; AND
(7) THE IMPACT, IF ANY, ON THE STATE’S SOCIOECONOMIC
PROCUREMENT PROGRAM POLICIES, INCLUDING THE POLICY OF ADVANCING
WOMEN– AND MINORITY–OWNED BUSINESSES AND PROVIDING FOR FAIR
COMPETITION BETWEEN BUSINESSES.
(D) IF A UNIT DECIDES TO REQUIRE THE USE OF A PROJECT LABOR
AGREEMENT IN CONNECTION WITH A LARGE–SCALE PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT, THE
UNIT SHALL CONSIDER REQUIRING BIDDERS TO INCORPORATE A COMMUNITY
BENEFIT AGREEMENT.

SENATE BILL 494 15
17–1003.
A PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENT FOR A LARGE–SCALE PUBLIC WORK
CONTRACT SHALL:
(1) ALLOW ALL CONTRACTORS, SUBCONTRACTORS, AND MATERIAL
SUPPLIERS WHO AGREE TO ABIDE BY THE TERMS OF THE PROJECT LABOR
AGREEMENT TO COMPETE FOR WORK TO BE PERFORMED AND MATERIALS TO BE
SUPPLIED WITHOUT REGARD TO WHETHER THEY ARE OTHERWISE PARTIES TO
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS;
(2) BIND ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS ON THE
PROJECT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF SPECIFICATIONS IN ALL RELEVANT
SOLICITATION PROVISIONS AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS;
(3) INCLUDE EFFECTIVE, PROMPT, AND MUTUALLY BINDING
PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING LABOR DISPUTES AND GRIEVANCES BEFORE THE
COMPLETION OF WORK;
(4) GUARANTEE AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, AND SIMILAR
DISRUPTIONS;
(5) PROVIDE PROOF OF ACCESS TO A RELIABLE SOURCE OF
PROPERLY TRAINED LABOR WHO POSSESS THE REQUISITE SKILL AND SAFETY
TRAINING TO ENSURE SUCCESSFUL PROJECT DELIVERY;
(6) PROVIDE OTHER MECHANISMS FOR LABOR–MANAGEMENT
COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL CONCERN, INCLUDING PRODUCTIVITY,
QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH;
(7) GUARANTEE EQUAL OPPORTUNITIES IN EMPLOYMENT AND
PROHIBIT DISCRIMINATION IN RECRUITMENT, INTERVIEWS, HIRING, UPGRADING,
SETTING WORKING CONDITIONS, OR DISCHARGING EMPLOYEES AS REQUIRED BY
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW;
(8) OUTLINE A PLAN FOR DIVERSITY THAT DETAILS EFFORTS AND
COMMITMENTS TO CONDUCT OUTREACH AND RECRUITMENT FOR EMPLOYMENT
AND APPRENTICESHIP POSITIONS FOR MINORITIES, WOMEN, AND MEMBERS OF
DISADVANTAGED COMMUNITIES;
(9) OUTLINE A PLAN THAT DETAILS HOW THE LARGE–SCALE PUBLIC
WORK CONTRACT WILL SUPPORT THE STATE’S SOCIOECONOMIC PROCUREMENT
PROGRAM GOALS; AND

SENATE BILL 494
(10) COMPLY WITH ALL FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS, REGULATIONS,
AND POLICIES.
17–1004.
(A) A UNIT SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE
STATE TO USE CONTRACTORS WHO PARTICIPATE IN REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAMS AND OFFER A RELIABLE PLAN FOR LABOR STAFFING ON A PUBLIC
PROJECT.
(B) A DECISION TO REQUIRE OR ENCOURAGE THE USE OF CONTRACTORS
WHO PARTICIPATE IN REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS AND OFFER A
RELIABLE PLAN FOR LABOR STAFFING ON A PUBLIC PROJECT:
(1) SHALL BE MADE ON A PROJECT–BY–PROJECT BASIS AND BEFORE
SELECTING THE METHOD OF CONTRACTING THE PUBLIC PROJECT; AND
(2) MAY BE MADE ONLY IF THE AGREEMENT ADVANCES THE STATE’S
INTERESTS REGARDING COST, EFFICIENCY, QUALITY, SAFETY, HEALTH,
TIMELINESS, A SKILLED LABOR FORCE, AND LABOR STABILITY.
(C) IN MAKING THE DECISION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE UNIT SHALL CONSIDER THE TOTALITY OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES,
INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF TRADES AND CRAFTS ANTICIPATED TO BE USED
ON THE PUBLIC PROJECT;
(2) THE SIZE, COMPLEXITY, AND URGENCY OF AND NEED FOR THE
PUBLIC PROJECT;
(3) THE POTENTIAL HARM TO THE PUBLIC IF A DELAY OCCURS;
(4) THE IMPACT, IF ANY, ON PROJECT COSTS AND THE STATE’S
OBLIGATION TO ENCOURAGE MAXIMUM PRACTICABLE COMPETITION FAVORING
OPEN COMPETITIVE BIDDING DURING THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS;
(5) THE IMPACT ON THE STATE’S SOCIOECONOMIC PROCUREMENT
PROGRAM POLICIES, INCLUDING THE POLICY TO ADVANCE WOMEN– AND
MINORITY–OWNED BUSINESSES AND THEIR ABILITY TO COMPETE; AND

SENATE BILL 494 17
(6) THE IMPACT ON WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND CONSTRUCTION
AND THE POTENTIAL FOR GENERATING SKILLS TRAINING AND EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES FOR STATE RESIDENTS.
(D) FOR EACH PUBLIC PROJECT, THE APPLICABLE UNIT SHALL RECORD
THE DECISION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IN WRITING.
(E) IF A UNIT MAKES THE DECISION TO REQUIRE OR ENCOURAGE THE USE
OF CONTRACTORS WHO PARTICIPATE IN REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
AND OFFER A RELIABLE PLAN FOR LABOR STAFFING ON A PUBLIC PROJECT, THE
APPLICABLE PROCUREMENT DOCUMENTS SHALL:
(1) SPECIFY WHETHER THE QUALIFICATIONS ARE MANDATORY OR
WILL BE USED AS AN EVALUATION FACTOR IN AWARDING THE PUBLIC PROJECT; AND
(2) STATE ANY APPLICABLE APPRENTICESHIP UTILIZATION TARGETS
OR THRESHOLDS THAT WILL BE CONSIDERED IN THE DETERMINATION REGARDING
THE AWARD OF THE PUBLIC PROJECT.
(F) (1) A SUCCESSFUL BIDDER SHALL DEMONSTRATE ACCESS TO A
RELIABLE SUPPLY OF PROPERLY TRAINED PERSONNEL WHO HAVE THE REQUIRED
SKILL AND SAFETY TRAINING TO ENSURE SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE PUBLIC
PROJECT BY:
(I) SPONSORING AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT WILL
SUPPLY APPRENTICES; OR
(II) REACHING AN AGREEMENT WITH AN ENTITY THAT
OPERATES A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT CAN SUPPLY THE
APPRENTICES.
(2) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT WILL SUPPLY
APPRENTICES ON THE PUBLIC PROJECT IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE
PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS BEFORE THE REPORTING AGENCY MAY AWARD THE
PUBLIC PROJECT.
(3) THE UNIT SHALL APPROVE THE BIDDER’S FULFILLMENT OF THE
REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE USE OF APPRENTICES ON THE PUBLIC PROJECT.
17–1005.

SENATE BILL 494
(A) IF A PUBLIC PROJECT HAS A PROJECTED COST THAT EXCEEDS
$5,000,000, THE UNIT SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) WHETHER ALL OR A SUBSTANTIAL PART OF THE PROJECT IS
LOCATED IN AN AREA WITH HIGHER THAN AVERAGE UNEMPLOYMENT; AND
(2) IF SO, WHETHER IT IS IN THE STATE’S BEST INTEREST TO
CONSIDER WHETHER A BIDDER VOLUNTARILY SUBMITS A COMMUNITY HIRING,
TRAINING, OR OUTREACH PLAN FOR HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT AREAS AS A FACTOR IN
THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS OR PUBLIC NOTICE.
(B) IF THE UNIT DETERMINES, BASED ON A TOTALITY OF THE
CIRCUMSTANCES, THAT IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE TO ENCOURAGE
THE VOLUNTARY SUBMISSION OF A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT FOR A
PUBLIC PROJECT, THE UNIT SHALL:
(1) RECORD THE DECISION IN WRITING; AND
(2) INCLUDE IN THE RECORD:
(I) A DEFINITION OF “HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT AREA”;
(II) A DESCRIPTION OF THE HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT AREA FOR
PURPOSES OF THE PROCUREMENT OR PUBLIC NOTICE OF SOLICITATION; AND
(III) AN EXPLANATION OF HOW THE PROFFER OF A COMMUNITY
HIRING, TRAINING, OR OUTREACH PLAN WILL BE EVALUATED IN THE
PROCUREMENT PROCESS OR PUBLIC NOTICE OF SOLICITATION.
Article – State Government
20–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Labor organization” means:
(i) a labor organization engaged in an industry; and
(ii) an agent of an organization described in item (i) of this
paragraph.
(2) “Labor organization” includes:

SENATE BILL 494 19
(i) an organization of any kind, an agency, or an employee
representation committee, group, association, or plan:
1. in which employees participate; and
2. that exists, wholly or partly, for the purpose of dealing
with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours, or other
terms or conditions of employment; and
(ii) a conference, general committee, joint or system board, or joint
council that is subordinate to a national or international labor organization.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.